test/src/morphology/N-syoyo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - сё: # Noun 'song' - partial paradigm /Type 6/
     сё+N+Sg+Nom: сё
     сё+N+Sg+Acc: сёмʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen: сёʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat: сёнʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc: сёхона
     сё+N+Sg+Abl: сёход
     сё+N+Sg+Pros: сёвна
     сё+N+Du+Nom: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom: сёˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Acc: сёё
     сё+N+Pl+Gen: сёёˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Dat: сёхоˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc: сёхоˮна
     сё+N+Pl+Abl: сёхот
     сё+N+Pl+Pros: сёёˮмана
         
     сё+N+Tra: сёӈэ
     сё+N+Car: сёсиˮ
     сё+N+Equ: сёдремʼ
     сё+N+Equ+Lat: сёдревʼ

# Possessive forms 

     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: сёв 
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: сёр  
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: сёда 
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: сёмиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: сёриʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: сёдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: сёваˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: сёраˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: сёдоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: сёв   
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: сёми  
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: сёмд  
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: сёмда 
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: сёмиʼ 
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: сёмдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: сёмдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: сёваˮ 
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: сёмдаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: сёмдоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: сён   
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: сёни  
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: сёнд  
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: сёнда 
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: сёниʼ 
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: сёндиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: сёндиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: сёнаˮ 
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: сёндаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: сёндоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: сёхон   
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: сёхони  
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: сёхонд  
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: сёхонда 
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: сёхониʼ 
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: сёхондиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: сёхондиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: сёхонаˮ 
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: сёхондаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: сёхондоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: сёхонан   
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: сёхонани  
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: сёхонанд  
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: сёхонанда 
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: сёхонаниʼ 
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: сёхонандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: сёхонандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: сёхонанаˮ 
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: сёхонандаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: сёхонандоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: сёходан   
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: сёходани  
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: сёходанд  
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: сёходанда 
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: сёходаниʼ 
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: сёходандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: сёходандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: сёходанаˮ 
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: сёходандаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: сёходандоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: сёвнан   
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: сёвнани  
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: сёвнанд  
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: сёвнанда 
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: сёвнаниʼ 
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: сёвнандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: сёвнандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: сёвнанаˮ 
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: сёвнандаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: сёвнандоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: сёхоюн  
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: сёхоюд  
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: сёхоюда 
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: сёхоюниʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: сёхоюдаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: сёхоюдоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: сёхоюн  
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: сёхоюд  
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: сёхоюда 
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: сёхоюниʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: сёхоюдаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: сёхоюдоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: сёхоюн  
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: сёхоют  
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: сёхоюта 
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: сёхоюниʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: сёхоютиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: сёхоютиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: сёхоютаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: сёхоютоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [сёён, сёёни]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: сёёд   
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: сёёда  
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: сёёниʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: сёёдиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: сёёдиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: сёёнаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: сёёдаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: сёёдоʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [сёён, сёёни] 
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: сёёд   
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: сёёда 
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: сёёниʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: сёёдиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: сёёдиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: сёёнаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: сёёдаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: сёёдоʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: сёёˮн
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: сёёт   
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: сёёта  
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: сёёˮниʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: сёётиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: сёётиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: сёёˮнаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: сёётаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: сёётоʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: сёхоˮн 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: сёхот 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: сёхота 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: сёхоˮниʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: сёхотиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: сёхотиʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: сёхоˮнаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: сёхотаˮ 
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: сёхотоʼ 
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: сёхоˮнан  
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: сёхоˮнат  
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: сёхоˮната 
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: сёхоˮнаниʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: сёхоˮнатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: сёхоˮнатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: сёхоˮнанаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: сёхоˮнатаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: сёхоˮнатоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [сёхотан, сёхотани]
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: сёхотат 
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: сёхотата 
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: сёхотаниʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: сёхотатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: сёхотатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: сёхотанаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: сёхотатаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: сёхотатоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: сёёˮманан  
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: сёёˮманат  
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: сёёˮманата 
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: сёёˮмананиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: сёёˮманатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: сёёˮманатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: сёёˮмананаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: сёёˮманатаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: сёёˮманатоʼ
     
# Predestinative 

     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: сёдав
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: сёдар
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: сёдда
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: сёдамиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: сёдариʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: сёддиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: сёдаваˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: сёдараˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: сёддоʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: сёдав
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: сёдамд
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: сёдамда
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: сёдамиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: сёдамдиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: сёдамдиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: сёдаваˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: сёдамдаˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: сёдамдоʼ    
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: сёдан
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: сёданд
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: сёданда
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: сёданиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: сёдандиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: сёдандиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: сёданаˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: сёдандаˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: сёдандоʼ
